spa/src/Affixes.lexc
LEXICON NRoot
(-edr)	No;
(-er)	No;
(-fil)	No;
(-graf)	No;
(-grafí)	Na;
(-gram)	Na;
(-itis)	Nzero;
(-log)	No;
(-logí)	Na;
(-scopi)	Na;
(-sis)	Nzero;
(-ónim)	No;
(-́log)	No;
(AMLO)	Nzero;
(Aarón)	Nzero;
(Abancay)	Nzero;
(Abel)	Nzero;
(Abiyán)	Nzero;
(Abraham)	Nzero;
(Acad)	Nzero;
(Acapulc)	No;
(Aconcagu)	Na;
(Acuñ)	Na;
(Adolf)	No;
(Adán)	Nzero;
(Agar)	Nzero;
(Agramont)	Ne;
(Aguascalientes)	Nzero;
(Aguirr)	Ne;
(Agustín)	Nzero;
(Ahuachapán)	Nzero;
(Alabam)	Na;
(Alajuel)	Na;
(Alan)	Nzero;
(Alask)	Na;
(Albacet)	Ne;
(Albani)	Na;
(Albany)	Nzero;
(Albeld)	Na;
(Albert)	Na;
(Albert)	No;
(Alcalá)	Nzero;
(Alcir)	Na;
(Alcorcón)	Nzero;
(Alcorán)	Nzero;
(Alcoy)	Nzero;
(Alcántar)	Na;
(Alejandr)	No;
(Alentej)	No;
(Alep)	No;
(Alfar)	No;
(Alfons)	No;
(Algab)	Na;
(Algeciras)	Nzero;
(Alguer)	Nzero;
(Alicant)	Ne;
(Alist)	Ne;
(Allend)	Ne;
(Aller)	Nzero;
(Almagr)	No;
(Almatý)	Nzero;
(Almerí)	Na;
(Almodóvar)	Nzero;
(Alquízar)	Nzero;
(Alsaci)	Na;
(Alvarad)	No;
(Amazon)	Na;
(Amenábar)	Nzero;
(Amsterdam)	Nzero;
(Améric)	Na;
(An)	Na;
(Anaxágoras)	Nzero;
(Anaxímenes)	Nzero;
(Anay)	Na;
(Andaluz)	Nzero;
(Andes)	Nzero;
(Andorr)	Na;
(Angol)	Na;
(Anguil)	Na;
(Antequer)	Na;
(Antigu)	Na;
(Antillas)	Nzero;
(Antioqui)	Na;
(Antofagast)	Na;
(Antoni)	No;
(Anzoátegui)	Nzero;
(Apur)	Ne;
(Apurímac)	Nzero;
(Aquitani)	Na;
(Aragu)	Na;
(Aragón)	Nzero;
(Aran)	Na;
(Arand)	Na;
(Arauc)	Na;
(Arauc)	No;
(Arequip)	Na;
(Argel)	Nzero;
(Aric)	Na;
(Aristófanes)	Nzero;
(Aristóteles)	Nzero;
(Arizon)	Na;
(Arkansas)	Nzero;
(Arned)	No;
(Arquímedes)	Nzero;
(Arriac)	Na;
(Arriol)	Na;
(Artemis)	Na;
(Artigas)	Nzero;
(Artur)	No;
(Arub)	Na;
(Arán)	Nzero;
(Aréval)	No;
(Asiri)	Na;
(Asp)	Ne;
(Astorg)	Na;
(Asturias)	Nzero;
(Asunción)	Nzero;
(Atacam)	Na;
(Atlant)	Na;
(Atlas)	Nzero;
(Atlántic)	No;
(August)	Na;
(Austin)	Nzero;
(Australi)	Na;
(Austri)	Na;
(Auverni)	Na;
(Averroes)	Nzero;
(Avilés)	Nzero;
(Ayacuch)	No;
(Ayamont)	Ne;
(Ayari)	Na;
(Ayerb)	Ne;
(Azawad)	Nzero;
(Azerbaiyán)	Nzero;
(Aznar)	Nzero;
(Azul)	Nzero;
(Babiloni)	Na;
(Bachelet)	Nzero;
(Badajoz)	Nzero;
(Badalon)	Na;
(Bahamas)	Nzero;
(Bahréin)	Nzero;
(Bakú)	Nzero;
(Balcanes)	Nzero;
(Bali)	Nzero;
(Bangkok)	Nzero;
(Bangladés)	Nzero;
(Baracald)	No;
(Baraco)	Na;
(Barbados)	Nzero;
(Barbastr)	No;
(Barcelon)	Na;
(Bargas)	Nzero;
(Barinas)	Nzero;
(Baroj)	Na;
(Barquisimet)	No;
(Basile)	Na;
(Batangas)	Nzero;
(Bayam)	No;
(Beirut)	Nzero;
(Belgrad)	No;
(Belic)	Ne;
(Beni)	Nzero;
(Benín)	Nzero;
(Berazategui)	Nzero;
(Berlín)	Nzero;
(Berme)	No;
(Bermud)	No;
(Bermudas)	Nzero;
(Bern)	Na;
(Bernard)	No;
(Bibli)	Na;
(Bilba)	No;
(Birmani)	Na;
(Birmingham)	Nzero;
(Boac)	No;
(Bogotá)	Nzero;
(Bolivi)	Na;
(Bollywood)	Nzero;
(Bolívar)	Nzero;
(Boquerón)	Nzero;
(Borbón)	Nzero;
(Borges)	Nzero;
(Boston)	Nzero;
(Botsuan)	Na;
(Botswan)	Na;
(Boyacá)	Nzero;
(Brasil)	Nzero;
(Bratislav)	Na;
(Brisban)	Ne;
(Bristol)	Nzero;
(Brunéi)	Nzero;
(Bruselas)	Nzero;
(Bucarest)	Nzero;
(Bulacán)	Nzero;
(Burgos)	Nzero;
(Burundi)	Nzero;
(Bután)	Nzero;
(Béjar)	Nzero;
(Caaguazú)	Nzero;
(Caazapá)	Nzero;
(Cabañas)	Nzero;
(Cabrer)	Na;
(Cachapoal)	Nzero;
(Cachemir)	Na;
(Caimaner)	Na;
(Cajamarc)	Na;
(Calabri)	Na;
(Calahorr)	Na;
(Calatrav)	Na;
(Caldas)	Nzero;
(Calderón)	Nzero;
(Calgary)	Nzero;
(Cali)	Nzero;
(Californi)	Na;
(Cam)	Nzero;
(Camagüey)	Nzero;
(Camboy)	Na;
(Camerún)	Nzero;
(Campech)	Ne;
(Canadá)	Nzero;
(Canberr)	Na;
(Candel)	Na;
(Cantabri)	Na;
(Cantón)	Nzero;
(Caquetá)	Nzero;
(Carabob)	No;
(Caracas)	Nzero;
(Carchi)	Nzero;
(Carib)	Ne;
(Carinti)	Na;
(Carlos)	Nzero;
(Carlot)	Na;
(Carmel)	No;
(Carmen)	Nzero;
(Carranz)	Na;
(Cartagen)	Na;
(Casablanc)	Na;
(Casad)	No;
(Casanar)	Ne;
(Castellón)	Nzero;
(Castill)	Na;
(Castill)	No;
(Castr)	No;
(Catamarc)	Na;
(Catar)	Nzero;
(Cauc)	Na;
(Cañar)	Nzero;
(Cebú)	Nzero;
(Ceilán)	Nzero;
(Central)	Nzero;
(Centroaméric)	Na;
(Cervantes)	Nzero;
(Cesar)	Nzero;
(Ceut)	Na;
(Chac)	No;
(Chacabuc)	No;
(Chachahuantl)	Na;
(Chad)	Nzero;
(Chalatenang)	No;
(Chañaral)	Nzero;
(Chep)	No;
(Chiapas)	Nzero;
(Chiclay)	No;
(Chihuahu)	Na;
(Chil)	Ne;
(Chillán)	Nzero;
(Chiloé)	Nzero;
(Chilpancing)	No;
(Chimaltenang)	No;
(Chimboraz)	No;
(Chin)	Na;
(Chinandeg)	Na;
(Chipil)	No;
(Chiriquí)	Nzero;
(Chitré)	Nzero;
(Choap)	Na;
(Chocó)	Nzero;
(Chontales)	Nzero;
(Chubut)	Nzero;
(Chuquisac)	Na;
(Chávez)	Nzero;
(Cicerón)	Nzero;
(Ciudadanos)	Nzero;
(Clar)	Na;
(Coahuil)	Na;
(Cobij)	Na;
(Cochabamb)	Na;
(Coclé)	Nzero;
(Codegu)	Na;
(Cojedes)	Nzero;
(Colchagu)	Na;
(Colim)	Na;
(Colomb)	No;
(Colombi)	Na;
(Coloni)	Na;
(Colorad)	No;
(Columbus)	Nzero;
(Colón)	Nzero;
(Comoras)	Nzero;
(Compostel)	Na;
(Concepción)	Nzero;
(Conch)	Na;
(Cong)	No;
(Copenhagu)	Ne;
(Copiapó)	Nzero;
(Coquimb)	No;
(Core)	Na;
(Corrientes)	Nzero;
(Corán)	Nzero;
(Cotopaxi)	Nzero;
(Coyhaiqu)	Ne;
(Cracovi)	Na;
(Crist)	No;
(Cristin)	Na;
(Cuaresm)	Na;
(Cub)	Na;
(Cuenc)	Na;
(Cundinamarc)	Na;
(Curaza)	No;
(Curicó)	Nzero;
(Cuy)	No;
(Cuzc)	No;
(Cáceres)	Nzero;
(Cádiz)	Nzero;
(Cárdenas)	Nzero;
(Cáucas)	No;
(Córdob)	Na;
(Cúcut)	Na;
(DF)	Nzero;
(Dac)	Na;
(Daguestán)	Nzero;
(Dakar)	Nzero;
(Danubi)	No;
(Darién)	Nzero;
(Darmstadt)	Nzero;
(Delhi)	Nzero;
(Denver)	Nzero;
(Dinamarc)	Na;
(Dios)	Nzero;
(Dolores)	Nzero;
(Doming)	No;
(Dominic)	Na;
(Dracón)	Nzero;
(Duart)	Ne;
(Dublín)	Nzero;
(Durazn)	No;
(Durban)	Nzero;
(Durán)	Nzero;
(Dusambé)	Nzero;
(ELN)	Nzero;
(ETA)	Nzero;
(Ecuador)	Nzero;
(Edimburg)	No;
(Edmonton)	Nzero;
(Egipt)	No;
(Eibar)	Nzero;
(Eld)	Na;
(Elqui)	Nzero;
(Empédocles)	Nzero;
(Enriqu)	Ne;
(Ensenad)	Na;
(Eocen)	No;
(Epir)	No;
(Ereván)	Nzero;
(Escoci)	Na;
(Esmerald)	Na;
(Esmeraldas)	Nzero;
(Esop)	No;
(Españ)	Na;
(Espej)	No;
(Estambul)	Nzero;
(Estelí)	Nzero;
(Estiri)	Na;
(Estoni)	Na;
(Ev)	Na;
(Ezcaray)	Nzero;
(Fabr)	Na;
(Facebook)	Nzero;
(Fallas)	Nzero;
(Faust)	No;
(Felip)	Ne;
(Fernand)	No;
(Filip)	No;
(Finlandi)	Na;
(Fiyi)	Nzero;
(Flor)	Na;
(Flores)	Nzero;
(Florid)	Na;
(For)	No;
(Formenter)	Na;
(Formos)	Na;
(Franc)	Na;
(Franc)	No;
(Francisc)	No;
(Frasc)	No;
(Fujimori)	Nzero;
(Fulan)	Na;
(Gabón)	Nzero;
(Gales)	Nzero;
(Galápagos)	Nzero;
(Gamarr)	Na;
(Gambi)	Na;
(Garlitos)	Nzero;
(Gaspar)	Nzero;
(Georgi)	Na;
(Getaf)	Ne;
(Ghan)	Na;
(Gibar)	Na;
(Gibraltar)	Nzero;
(Gijón)	Nzero;
(Gimen)	No;
(Ginebr)	Na;
(Glasgow)	Nzero;
(Gonzal)	No;
(Gotemburg)	No;
(Goy)	Na;
(Granad)	Na;
(Gregori)	No;
(Groenlandi)	Na;
(Guadalajar)	Na;
(Guainí)	Na;
(Guairá)	Nzero;
(Guam)	Nzero;
(Guambi)	Na;
(Guaminí)	Nzero;
(Guanacast)	Ne;
(Guanajay)	Nzero;
(Guanajuat)	No;
(Guantánam)	No;
(Guardiol)	Na;
(Guatemal)	Na;
(Guaviar)	Ne;
(Guayan)	Na;
(Guayaquil)	Nzero;
(Guayas)	Nzero;
(Guevar)	Na;
(Guine)	Na;
(Guipúzco)	Na;
(Gutierr)	Ne;
(Guyan)	Na;
(Guáimar)	No;
(Guáric)	No;
(Génov)	Na;
(Haití)	Nzero;
(Hamburg)	No;
(Hamilton)	Nzero;
(Hamlet)	Nzero;
(Hannover)	Nzero;
(Hanói)	Nzero;
(Hawái)	Nzero;
(Heredi)	Na;
(Hermosill)	No;
(Hernand)	No;
(Hernán)	Nzero;
(Herrer)	Na;
(Heráclit)	No;
(Hidalg)	No;
(Hitler)	Nzero;
(Holand)	Na;
(Holguín)	Nzero;
(Honduras)	Nzero;
(Houston)	Nzero;
(Huancavelic)	Na;
(Huant)	Na;
(Huaraz)	Nzero;
(Huasc)	No;
(Huehuetenang)	No;
(Huelv)	Na;
(Huert)	Na;
(Huil)	Na;
(Humahuac)	Na;
(Huánuc)	No;
(Hércules)	Nzero;
(Ibarr)	Na;
(Ic)	Na;
(Idah)	No;
(Igualad)	Na;
(Illinois)	Nzero;
(Imbabur)	Na;
(Inglaterr)	Na;
(Intibucá)	Nzero;
(Inés)	Nzero;
(Iow)	Na;
(Iquiqu)	Ne;
(Iquitos)	Nzero;
(Irak)	Nzero;
(Irland)	Na;
(Irán)	Nzero;
(Islandi)	Na;
(Ismael)	Nzero;
(Israel)	Nzero;
(Itali)	Na;
(Itapú)	Na;
(Iván)	Nzero;
(Jalap)	Na;
(Jalisc)	No;
(Jamaic)	Na;
(Japón)	Nzero;
(Javier)	Nzero;
(Jaén)	Nzero;
(Jenófanes)	Nzero;
(Jerez)	Nzero;
(Jesús)	Nzero;
(Jimaguayú)	Nzero;
(Jimen)	No;
(Jinoteg)	Na;
(Johannesburg)	No;
(Jordani)	Na;
(Jorg)	Ne;
(José)	Nzero;
(Juan)	Na;
(Juan)	Nzero;
(Jujuy)	Nzero;
(Junín)	Nzero;
(Jutiap)	Na;
(Júpiter)	Nzero;
(Keni)	Na;
(Kentucky)	Nzero;
(Kiev)	Nzero;
(Kinsas)	Na;
(Kirchner)	Nzero;
(Kiribati)	Nzero;
(Kuwait)	Nzero;
(Labort)	Nzero;
(Lambayequ)	Ne;
(Lantadill)	Na;
(Lanzarot)	Ne;
(Laos)	Nzero;
(Lar)	Na;
(Lares)	Nzero;
(Latinoaméric)	Na;
(Lebu)	Nzero;
(Leganés)	Nzero;
(Lempir)	Na;
(Lenin)	Nzero;
(Lep)	Ne;
(Lesbos)	Nzero;
(Lesot)	No;
(Letici)	Na;
(León)	Nzero;
(Liberi)	Na;
(Liechtenstein)	Nzero;

LEXICON Prefixes
a-	NRoot;
ab-	NRoot;
acui-	NRoot;
adeno-	NRoot;
aero-	NRoot;
afro-	NRoot;
agro-	NRoot;
ambi-	NRoot;
an-	NRoot;
ana-	NRoot;
anarco-	NRoot;
andro-	NRoot;
anfi-	NRoot;
angio-	NRoot;
anglo-	NRoot;
aniso-	NRoot;
ante-	NRoot;
anti-	NRoot;
anto-	NRoot;
antropo-	NRoot;
archi-	NRoot;
arqueo-	NRoot;
arqui-	NRoot;
astro-	NRoot;
atero-	NRoot;
atto-	NRoot;
audio-	NRoot;
auto-	NRoot;
bacterio-	NRoot;
baro-	NRoot;
bi-	NRoot;
bio-	NRoot;
bis-	NRoot;
braqui-	NRoot;
bronco-	NRoot;
buro-	NRoot;
cachi-	NRoot;
calco-	NRoot;
cardio-	NRoot;
centi-	NRoot;
ciano-	NRoot;
ciber-	NRoot;
ciclo-	NRoot;
circun-	NRoot;
cis-	NRoot;
cito-	NRoot;
cloro-	NRoot;
co-	NRoot;
com-	NRoot;
con-	NRoot;
condro-	NRoot;
contra-	NRoot;
cosmo-	NRoot;
crio-	NRoot;
cripto-	NRoot;
cromo-	NRoot;
crono-	NRoot;
cuasi-	NRoot;
de-	NRoot;
deca-	NRoot;
deci-	NRoot;
dendro-	NRoot;
derm-	NRoot;
des-	NRoot;
di-	NRoot;
dia-	NRoot;
dis-	NRoot;
dodeca-	NRoot;
eco-	NRoot;
eka-	NRoot;
electro-	NRoot;
em-	NRoot;
en-	NRoot;
endo-	NRoot;
entero-	NRoot;
entre-	NRoot;
epi-	NRoot;
equi-	NRoot;
es-	NRoot;
espeleo-	NRoot;
espondilo-	NRoot;
estereo-	NRoot;
etno-	NRoot;
euro-	NRoot;
ex-	NRoot;
exa-	NRoot;
exo-	NRoot;
extra-	NRoot;
femto-	NRoot;
ferro-	NRoot;
fisio-	NRoot;
fito-	NRoot;
fono-	NRoot;
fosfo-	NRoot;
foto-	NRoot;
galvano-	NRoot;
gastr-	NRoot;
gastro-	NRoot;
geli-	NRoot;
geo-	NRoot;
giga-	NRoot;
gineco-	NRoot;
glico-	NRoot;
halo-	NRoot;
hecto-	NRoot;
hemato-	NRoot;
hemo-	NRoot;
hepato-	NRoot;
hepta-	NRoot;
hetero-	NRoot;
hidro-	NRoot;
hiper-	NRoot;
hipo-	NRoot;
hispano-	NRoot;
histo-	NRoot;
homeo-	NRoot;
homo-	NRoot;
i-	NRoot;
icosa-	NRoot;
im-	NRoot;
imp-	NRoot;
in-	NRoot;
infra-	NRoot;
inmuno-	NRoot;
inter-	NRoot;
kilo-	NRoot;
lacto-	NRoot;
lecto-	NRoot;
lipo-	NRoot;
lito-	NRoot;
macro-	NRoot;
mal-	NRoot;
mala-	NRoot;
masto-	NRoot;
mega-	NRoot;
meso-	NRoot;
meta-	NRoot;
mico-	NRoot;
micro-	NRoot;
mielo-	NRoot;
mili-	NRoot;
milli-	NRoot;
mini-	NRoot;
mono-	NRoot;
morfo-	NRoot;
moto-	NRoot;
multi-	NRoot;
nano-	NRoot;
narco-	NRoot;
naso-	NRoot;
necro-	NRoot;
nefro-	NRoot;
neo-	NRoot;
neumo-	NRoot;
neuro-	NRoot;
nor-	NRoot;
nord-	NRoot;
oligo-	NRoot;
omni-	NRoot;
organo-	NRoot;
oro-	NRoot;
osteo-	NRoot;
oto-	NRoot;
paleo-	NRoot;
pan-	NRoot;
para-	NRoot;
penta-	NRoot;
per-	NRoot;
peri-	NRoot;
peta-	NRoot;
pico-	NRoot;
piro-	NRoot;
plati-	NRoot;
pluri-	NRoot;
poli-	NRoot;
pos-	NRoot;
post-	NRoot;
pre-	NRoot;
pro-	NRoot;
proto-	NRoot;
pseudo-	NRoot;
psico-	NRoot;
quilo-	NRoot;
quimio-	NRoot;
quiro-	NRoot;
radio-	NRoot;
re-	NRoot;
retro-	NRoot;
rino-	NRoot;
sarco-	NRoot;
semi-	NRoot;
sero-	NRoot;
servo-	NRoot;
seudo-	NRoot;
sobre-	NRoot;
sota-	NRoot;
soto-	NRoot;
sub-	NRoot;
sud-	NRoot;
super-	NRoot;
supra-	NRoot;
tardo-	NRoot;
tele-	NRoot;
teno-	NRoot;
tera-	NRoot;
termo-	NRoot;
tetra-	NRoot;
tiro-	NRoot;
trans-	NRoot;
traqueo-	NRoot;
tras-	NRoot;
tri-	NRoot;
turbo-	NRoot;
ultra-	NRoot;
vice-	NRoot;
video-	NRoot;
xeno-	NRoot;
xilo-	NRoot;
yocto-	NRoot;
yotta-	NRoot;
zepto-	NRoot;
zetta-	NRoot;
zoo-	NRoot;
